Nebraska, session 109, LB999.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB999 LB999
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) Sections 1 to 5 of this act shall be known and may
be cited as the Business Innovation and Startup Commission Act.
(2) The purposes of the Business Innovation and Startup Commission
Act are to:
(a) Create the Business Innovation and Startup Commission to provide
for general planning, coordination, and an operating program to support
entrepreneurship, startups, and business innovation in Nebraska;
(b) Provide for grants and other assistance for the purpose of
expanding access to capital, commercialization, and business development
services as part of a comprehensive statewide innovation ecosystem; and
(c) Authorize collaboration with state agencies, political
subdivisions, educational institutions, and private partners for the
purpose of strengthening and aligning Nebraska's startup and innovation
infrastructure.
Sec. 2. (1) The Business Innovation and Startup Commission is
hereby created.
(2) The purpose of the commission is to champion business and
innovation in Nebraska including making recommendations regarding
policies, programs, and regulatory structures that promote economic
growth through, but not limited to, business formation and startup
success, innovation and entrepreneurship, and a comprehensive approach to
resilient economic systems in Nebraska.
(3) The commission shall consist of the following members:
(a) Each chief executive officer or director of the state innovation
hubs;
(b) One member that is the chief executive officer, founder, or
principal owner of a business with five million dollars or less in annual
revenue and operates in a rural area of the state appointed by the
Governor;
(c) One member representing a chamber of commerce appointed by the
Governor;
-2-

LB999 LB999
2026 2026
(d) One member representing an economic development corporation
appointed by the Governor;
(e) One member representing a Nebraska-based venture capital fund,
angel investment network, or startup financing organization with
demonstrated experience investing in early-stage companies appointed by
the Governor;
(f) One member representing a research university or community
college engaged in applied research, commercialization, or workforce-
aligned innovation appointed by the Governor;
(g) One member representing a manufacturing, agricultural
technologies, or industry innovation sector critical to Nebraska's
economy appointed by the Governor;
(h) One member representing a community-based or minority-serving
organization with demonstrated experience supporting underrepresented
entrepreneurs or small businesses appointed by the Governor;
(i) One member representing the Department of Economic Development,
who shall serve as a nonvoting, ex officio member; and
(j) One member representing the Department of Labor, who shall serve
as a nonvoting, ex officio member.
(4) Appointments shall be made within sixty days after the effective
date of this act.
(5) The members of the commission shall serve for a term of four
years with a maximum of two terms and shall serve without compensation,
but may be reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to
81-1177.
(6) The commission shall elect a chairperson and vice-chairperson
from among its members.
(7) The commission shall meet at least quarterly and may meet more
frequently at the call of the chairperson. A majority of the members of
the commission shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of transacting
business.
-3-

LB999 LB999
2026 2026
Sec. 3. The Business Innovation and Startup Commission shall:
(1) Develop, administer, coordinate, and evaluate programs and
initiatives that support business formation, startup growth, innovation,
and entrepreneurship in Nebraska;
(2) Evaluate barriers to business formation and growth, including
regulatory, financing, workforce, and infrastructure barriers;
(3) Examine access to capital for startups and small emerging
businesses, including debt, equity, seed, and alternative financing
tools;
(4) Study best practices from other states related to innovation
policy, startup ecosystems, and emerging industries;
(5) Review and assess existing state programs and policies related
to economic development, innovation, and entrepreneurship in order to
align state economic development incentives with startup and innovation
driven enterprises;
(6) Make recommendations for statutory, regulatory, or
administrative changes to the Governor and Legislature to improve
Nebraska's business innovation environment;
(7) Study and implement best practices and strategies from other
states related to innovation policy, startup ecosystems, and emerging
industries to promote commercialization of research, technology transfer,
and high-growth entrepreneurship;
(8) Develop and administer grant programs using appropriated funds
or other available resources to support startup formation, business
innovation, commercialization, access to capital, and technical
assistance;
(9) Coordinate with state agencies, political subdivisions,
educational institutions, nonprofit organizations, and private-sector
partners to better coordinate a comprehensive statewide business
innovation and startup ecosystem, including identifying existing
programs, gaps, and redundancies and recommending strategies to improve
-4-

LB999 LB999
2026 2026
alignment and accessibility; and
(10) Support regional and sector-based innovation hubs, including
incubators, accelerators, and entrepreneurial support organizations,
through partnerships, technical assistance, and targeted grants in both
urban and rural areas.
Sec. 4. The Business Innovation and Startup Fund is created. The
fund shall consist of funds transferred by the Legislature. The Business
Innovation and Startup Commission shall use the fund for the purpose of
implementing the Business Innovation and Startup Commission Act. Any
money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 5. (1) On or before December 1, 2027, and on or before
December 1 of each year thereafter, the Business Innovation and Startup
Commission shall submit a report of its activities, findings, and
recommendations electronically to the Legislature.
(2) Each report shall include:
(a) A summary of the commission's activity during the preceding
year;
(b) An accounting of grant awards and other financial assistance;
(c) An evaluation of progress toward the development of a
comprehensive and inclusive business innovation and startup ecosystem;
(d) Measurable outcomes related to startup formation, business
growth, access to capital, geographic distribution, and participation by
underserved or underrepresented communities; and
(e) Any recommendations for statutory, regulatory, or budgetary
changes necessary to improve the effectiveness of the commission's
programs and mission.
-5-